North Carolina, session 2025, SB1036.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 160A-288 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-288. Cooperation between law enforcement agencies.
…
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Head" means any director or chief officer of a law enforcement agency
including the chief of police of a local department, chief of police of a county
police department, and the sheriff of a county,county, and chief of a tribal
police department, or an officer of one of the above named agencies to whom
the head of that agency has delegated authority to make or grant requests under
this section, but only one officer in the agency shall have this delegated
authority at any time.
(2) "Law enforcement agency" or "agency" means a municipal police department,
a county police department, or a sheriff's office of this State.State, or any tribal
police department described in G.S. 1E-11. Subject to G.S. 15A-403, it also
includes a municipal police department, a county police department, or a
sheriff's office of another state if the laws of the other state allow for the
provision of mutual aid with out-of-state law enforcement officers. All other
State and local agencies are exempted from the provisions of this section.
…."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Safety the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year to assist with administering the requirements of this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S1036-v-1*